Tennessee, session 114, SB0153.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 2-13-203(e)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(2)
(A) If a nonrecognized minor party seeking recognition as a recognized
minor party decides to nominate by primary election under this section, the
officers of the nonrecognized minor party shall file a notice with the coordinator of
elections of its intent to nominate by primary election by twelve o'clock (12:00)
noon, prevailing time, by the qualifying deadline established in subdivision (e)(1).
The notice must be in writing and signed by two (2) officers with authority to act
for the party. The notice must be notarized and contain the following statement:
We, and , officers of the Party certify
under penalty of perjury that we are authorized to act for the
Party.
(B) The officers who filed the notice under subdivision (e)(2)(A) may
revoke or rescind their decision to nominate by primary election by providing the
coordinator of elections with written notice not less than ninety (90) days before
the qualifying deadline.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0153
001308
- 1 -